South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Article 1 of the Constitution of this State be amended by adding: Section 26. Every individual has a fundamental right to healthcare provided and paid for by the State of South Carolina. SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Article 1 of the Constitution of this State, relating to the declaration of rights under the state's constitution, be amended so as to provide that every individual has a fundamental right to healthcare provided and paid for by the State of South Carolina? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----